Hawaii, session 2025, GM1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
SECTION 1. Chapter 264, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
”§264- Private streets; ownership. (a) Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, in any county with a
population of less than 250,000, fee simple absolute title of a
privately owned highway, road, alley, street, way, lane,
bikeway, bridge, or trail held by a subdivider shall be deemed
transferred to a community association consisting of the owners
of property contiguous or adjacent thereto, when;
(1) The subdivider has dissolved or ceased to exist for
not less than five years; and
(2) There has not been a dedication of the privately owned
highway, road, alley, street, way, lane, bikeway,
bridge, or trail by deed of conveyance naming the
State or county as grantee pursuant to subsection
2642^11c1j
2025-2909 SB321 CDl SMA.docx
iNiiwiiininiiiiHiiH

Page 2 S.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
(3) The community association to which the property is to
be transferred has given written notice of a potential
transfer of property pursuant to this section to all
property owners contiguous or adjacent thereto, the
mayor of the county within which the property resides,
the administrative judge of the circuit court of the
first circuit with jurisdiction over land court within
the Hawaii State Judiciary, the Bureau of Conveyances,
and published in a paper of broad circulation in the
county in which the property is located; and
(4) A year has lapsed without the filing of a competing
challenge or claim since the community association has
met the requirements pursuant to paragraph (3).
(b) For the purposes of this section:
"Community association” means a nonprofit homeowners or
community association existing pursuant to covenants running
witli yie J^an^
"Subdivider” means a person, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, or other legal entity or
combination thereof causing land to be subdivided or
2025-2909 SB321 CDl SMA.docx 2
■IMMHIIIIIIillinilllill

Page 3 S.B. NO.
s" 1
C.D. 1
consolidated, which is the owner of the land or the duly
authorized agent or lessee of the owner."
SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027 and
shall repeal on July 1, 2032.
2025-2909 SB321 CDl SMA.docx 3
iimhuimiiiiiiiiiiih

S.B. NO. "
W
±
O
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 321, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai ‘ i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 321,SD 1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives